Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.180

City may extend water system outside limits—May acquire property outside city.

A city or town may construct, purchase, or acquire any waterworks, pipe lines, distribution systems and any extensions thereof, necessary to furnish such outside service.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.92.180. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 17 s 2; RRS s 9502-2. Cf. 1917 c 12 s 1. Formerly RCW 80.40.180.]